Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.500

Statewide 911 telephone service—Finding.

The legislature finds that a statewide emergency communications network of 911 telephone service, which allows an immediate display of a caller's identification and location, would serve to further the safety, health, and welfare of the state's citizens, and would save lives. The legislature, after reviewing the study outlined in section 1, chapter 260, Laws of 1990, further finds that statewide implementation of 911 telephone service is feasible and should be accomplished as soon as practicable.

[ 2022 c 203 s 5; 1991 c 54 s 1.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Referral to electorate—1991 c 54: See note following RCW 38.52.030.